Hawaii statutes.
[§46-20] Regulation of sewerage and
wastewater treatment systems. Effective July 1, 1987, counties may
implement programs for the regulation of sewerage and wastewater treatment
systems in their respective county jurisdictions; except that a county program
shall be implemented by that county immediately upon receipt of state funds
pursuant to section 27-21.6(5). Each county is authorized to adopt ordinances
and rules on the design, construction, and operation of sewerage and treatment
systems and shall submit to the director of health, for approval, a full and
complete description of the program it proposes to establish and administer
under county laws. [L 1985, c 282, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next